South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4968.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 3, Title 34 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 34-3-120.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a bank or financial institution may not charge a fee greater than one dollar and seventy-five cents for each automated teller machine (ATM) transaction. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----